Idaho, session 2025, H0044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1631, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1631. REQUIREMENTS FOR HARASSMENT, INTIMIDATION AND BULLYING IN-
FORMATION AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. (1) School districts and charter
schools shall undertake reasonable efforts to ensure that information on
harassment, intimidation and bullying of students is disseminated annually
to all school personnel, parents and students, including an affirmation
that school personnel are authorized and expected to intervene or facilitate
intervention on behalf of students facing harassment, intimidation or bul-
lying.
(2) School districts and charter schools shall provide ongoing profes-
sional development to build skills of all school staff members to prevent,
identify and respond to harassment, intimidation and bullying. The state
board shall promulgate rules regarding the content of the professional de-
velopment required by this subsection.
(3) District School district policies shall include:
(a) a A series of graduated consequences that may include, but are not
limited to, referral to counseling, diversion, use of juvenile spe-
cialty courts, restorative practices, on-site suspension and expulsion
for any student who commits an act of bullying, intimidation, harass-
ment, violence or threats of violence. Guidelines for such policies
will be set forth in the rules of the state board.; and
(b) In compliance with all federal and state laws protecting stu-
dent privacy, a procedure for the reporting of those incidents of
harassment, intimidation, and bullying that result in a student being
suspended from school pursuant to section 33-205, Idaho Code. The oc-
currence of such incidents shall be reported to the parents or legal
guardians of both the alleged victim and the alleged perpetrator and law
enforcement if the alleged conduct may violate any criminal law.
(4) Annually school districts shall report bullying incidents to the
state department of education in a format set forth in rule by the state
board. District policy shall designate persons to whom bullying reports are
to be made and a procedure for a teacher or other school employee, student,
parent, guardian or other person to report or otherwise provide information
on bullying activity.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.